Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-672
Traffic infraction, defined.

Traffic infraction shall mean the violation of any provision of the Nebraska Rules of the Road or of any law, ordinance, order, rule, or regulation regulating traffic which is not otherwise declared to be a misdemeanor or a felony.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 168;

Laws 2000, LB 74, § 1.